src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON Numeral   !!= * **@CODE@**  initial lexica
!            MILJON           ; ! a noun of its own
!            UNDERDUHAT       ; ! for generator under 1000
!            JUSTDUHAT        ; ! going via 1000
!            OVERDUHAT        ; ! for generator over 1000
!            OLD              ; ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.
!            num-imprecise    ;
!            num-collective   ;
             ARABICS           ; ! for the arabic numerals        !
             ARABIC           ; ! for the arabic numerals        !
             ROMAN            ; ! for the roman numerals         !
             NUM-PREFIXES     ; ! for §34 etc.                   !
             ISOLATED-NUMEXP  ; ! for ½ etc.                     !
!            11TO99F          ;
!            21TO99           ;
!           DUHAT            ;
!            1TO9DUHAT        ;
!            O-NUPPELOHKAI    ;
!            NUPPELOHKAICUODI ;
!            NUPPELOHKAI      ;

! ONES ;


dohat+Num:dohat  NUM_AANAR ; ! 1000
dohttad+A:dohtt A-ORD_NEELLJAD    ; ! 1000.
@U.NUMORTH.YES@ UNDERTHOUSAND   ; ! 100-999
@U.NUMORTH.YES@ TENS            ; ! 20-99
@U.NUMORTH.YES@ TEENS           ; ! 10-19
@U.NUMORTH.YES@ INITIALCARDINAL ; ! 1-9

muäʹddlo+Num:muäʹdˈd#l NUM_LO ;! 2024-08-08 Jaska
!kuâhttlo+Num:kuâhtt#l NUM_LO ;
!kuâhttloõhtt+Num:kuâhtt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!kuâhttlokueʹhtt+Num:kuâhtt#lo#kuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!kuâhttlokoumm+Num:kuâhtt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!kuâhttlonellj+Num:kuâhtt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!kuâhttlovitt+Num:kuâhtt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!kuâhttlokutt+Num:kuâhtt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!kuâhttločiččâm+Num:kuâhtt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!kuâhttlokääuʹc+Num:kuâhtt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!kuâhttloååuʹc+Num:kuâhtt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!koummlo+Num:koum#m#l NUM_LO ;
!koummlo-õhtt+Num:koumm#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!koummlokueʹhtt+Num:koumm#lo#kuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!koummlokoumm+Num:koumm#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!koummlonellj+Num:koumm#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!koummlovitt+Num:koumm#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!koummlokutt+Num:koumm#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!koummločiččâm+Num:koumm#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!koummlokääuʹc+Num:koumm#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!koummloååuʹc+Num:koumm#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!nelljlo+Num:nellj#l NUM_LO ;
!nelljlo-õhtt+Num:nellj#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!nelljlokueʹhtt+Num:nellj#lokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!nelljlokoumm+Num:nellj#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!nelljlonellj+Num:nellj#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!nelljlovitt+Num:nellj#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!nelljlokutt+Num:nellj#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!nelljločiččâm+Num:nellj#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!nelljlokääuʹc+Num:nellj#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!nelljloååuʹc+Num:nellj#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!vittlo+Num:vitt#l NUM_LO ;
!vittlo-õhtt+Num:vitt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!vittlokueʹhtt+Num:vitt#lokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!vittlokoumm+Num:vitt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!vittlonellj+Num:vitt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!vittlovitt+Num:vitt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!vittlokutt+Num:vitt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!vittločiččâm+Num:vitt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!vittlokääuʹc+Num:vitt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!vittloååuʹc+Num:vitt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!kuttlo+Num:kutt#l NUM_LO ;
!kuttlo-õhtt+Num:kutt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!kuttlokueʹhtt+Num:kutt#lokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!kuttlokoumm+Num:kutt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!kuttlonellj+Num:kutt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!kuttlovitt+Num:kutt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!kuttlokutt+Num:kutt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!kuttločiččâm+Num:kutt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!kuttlokääuʹc+Num:kutt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!kuttloååuʹc+Num:kutt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
čičmlo+v2+Num:čiinn#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čičmlo+v1+Num:čič#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čičmlo-õhtt+Num:čičm#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čičmlokueʹhtt+Num:čičmlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čičmlokoumm+Num:čičm#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čičmlonellj+Num:čičm#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čičmlovitt+Num:čičm#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čičmlokutt+Num:čičm#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čičmločiččâm+Num:čičm#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čičmlokääuʹc+Num:čičm#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čičmloååuʹc+Num:čičm#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!käʹhcclo+Num:käʹhcc#l NUM_LO ;
!käʹhcclo-õhtt+Num:käʹhcc#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!käʹhcclokueʹhtt+Num:käʹhcclokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!käʹhcclokoumm+Num:käʹhcc#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!käʹhcclonellj+Num:käʹhcc#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!käʹhcclovitt+Num:käʹhcc#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!käʹhcclokutt+Num:käʹhcc#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!käʹhccločiččâm+Num:käʹhcc#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!käʹhcclokääuʹc+Num:käʹhcc#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!käʹhccloååuʹc+Num:käʹhcc#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!åʹhcclo+Num:åʹhcc#l NUM_LO ;
!åʹhcclo-õhtt+Num:åʹhcc#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!åʹhcclokueʹhtt+Num:åʹhcclokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!åʹhcclokoumm+Num:åʹhcc#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!åʹhcclonellj+Num:åʹhcc#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!åʹhcclovitt+Num:åʹhcc#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!åʹhcclokutt+Num:åʹhcc#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!åʹhccločiččâm+Num:åʹhcc#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!åʹhcclokääuʹc+Num:åʹhcc#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!åʹhccloååuʹc+Num:åʹhcc#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹtt+Num:čuâ{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQLL ;
!čueʹttõhtt+Num:čueʹtt#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttkueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttkuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttkoumm+Num:čueʹtt#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttnellj+Num:čueʹtt#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttvitt+Num:čueʹtt#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkutt+Num:čueʹtt#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttčiččâm+Num:čueʹtt#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttkääuʹc+Num:čueʹtt#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttååuʹc+Num:čueʹtt#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttlååi+Num:čueʹtt#l NUM_LOAOAI ;
!čueʹttõtmlo+Num:čueʹttõt#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkuâtmlo+Num:čueʹttkuât#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkonmlo+Num:čueʹttkon#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttnenjmlo+Num:čueʹttnenj#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttvittmlo+Num:čueʹttvitt#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkuttmlo+Num:čueʹttkutt#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttčinmlo+Num:čueʹttčin#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkäcmlo+Num:čueʹttkäc#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttåcmlo+Num:čueʹttåc#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkuâhttlo+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkuâhttlo-õhtt+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttkuâhttlokueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttkuâhttlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttkuâhttlokoumm+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttkuâhttlonellj+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttkuâhttlovitt+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkuâhttlokutt+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkuâhttločiččâm+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttkuâhttlokääuʹc+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttkuâhttloååuʹc+Num:čueʹttkuâhtt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttkoummlo+Num:čueʹttkoum#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkoummlo-õhtt+Num:čueʹttkoumm#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttkoummlokueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttkoummlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttkoummlokoumm+Num:čueʹttkoumm#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttkoummlonellj+Num:čueʹttkoumm#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttkoummlovitt+Num:čueʹttkoumm#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkoummlokutt+Num:čueʹttkoumm#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkoummločiččâm+Num:čueʹttkoumm#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttkoummlokääuʹc+Num:čueʹttkoumm#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttkoummloååuʹc+Num:čueʹttkoumm#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttnelljlo+Num:čueʹttnellj#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttnelljlo-õhtt+Num:čueʹttnellj#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttnelljlokueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttnelljlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttnelljlokoumm+Num:čueʹttnellj#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttnelljlonellj+Num:čueʹttnellj#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttnelljlovitt+Num:čueʹttnellj#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttnelljlokutt+Num:čueʹttnellj#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttnelljločiččâm+Num:čueʹttnellj#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttnelljlokääuʹc+Num:čueʹttnellj#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttnelljloååuʹc+Num:čueʹttnellj#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttvittlo+Num:čueʹttvitt#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttvittlo-õhtt+Num:čueʹttvitt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttvittlokueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttvittlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttvittlokoumm+Num:čueʹttvitt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttvittlonellj+Num:čueʹttvitt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttvittlovitt+Num:čueʹttvitt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttvittlokutt+Num:čueʹttvitt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttvittločiččâm+Num:čueʹttvitt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttvittlokääuʹc+Num:čueʹttvitt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttvittloååuʹc+Num:čueʹttvitt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttkuttlo+Num:čueʹttkutt#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkuttlo-õhtt+Num:čueʹttkutt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttkuttlokueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttkuttlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttkuttlokoumm+Num:čueʹttkutt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttkuttlonellj+Num:čueʹttkutt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttkuttlovitt+Num:čueʹttkutt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkuttlokutt+Num:čueʹttkutt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkuttločiččâm+Num:čueʹttkutt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttkuttlokääuʹc+Num:čueʹttkutt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttkuttloååuʹc+Num:čueʹttkutt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttčimlo+Num:čueʹttči#m#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttčimlo-õhtt+Num:čueʹtt#čim#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttčimlokueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttčimlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttčimlokoumm+Num:čueʹtt#čim#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttčimlonellj+Num:čueʹtt#čim#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttčimlovitt+Num:čueʹtt#čim#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttčimlokutt+Num:čueʹtt#čim#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttčimločiččâm+Num:čueʹtt#čim#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttčimlokääuʹc+Num:čueʹtt#čim#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttčimloååuʹc+Num:čueʹtt#čim#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttkäʹhcclo+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttkäʹhcclo-õhtt+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttkäʹhcclokueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttkäʹhcclokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttkäʹhcclokoumm+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttkäʹhcclonellj+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttkäʹhcclovitt+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkäʹhcclokutt+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttkäʹhccločiččâm+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttkäʹhcclokääuʹc+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttkäʹhccloååuʹc+Num:čueʹtt#käʹhcc#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttåʹhcclo+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#l NUM_LO ;
!čueʹttåʹhcclo-õhtt+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!čueʹttåʹhcclokueʹhtt+Num:čueʹttåʹhcclokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!čueʹttåʹhcclokoumm+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!čueʹttåʹhcclonellj+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!čueʹttåʹhcclovitt+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttåʹhcclokutt+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!čueʹttåʹhccločiččâm+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!čueʹttåʹhcclokääuʹc+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!čueʹttåʹhccloååuʹc+Num:čueʹtt#åʹhcc#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđ+Num:kueʹhtt#čuâ{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQLL ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđõhtt+Num:kueʹhtt#čueʹđ#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđkueʹhtt+Num:kueʹhtt#čueʹđ#kuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđkoumm+Num:kueʹhtt#čueʹđ#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđnellj+Num:kueʹhtt#čueʹđ#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđvitt+Num:kueʹhtt#čueʹđ#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđkutt+Num:kueʹhtt#čueʹđ#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđčiččâm+Num:kueʹhtt#čueʹđ#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđkääuʹc+Num:kueʹhtt#čueʹđ#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
